Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1454XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1454XD (3) 91
jda/jh

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 11, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
11. A majority of the membership of each charter school’s
governing board shall be residents of the geographic area
served by the charter school. Each member of the governing
board who is not a resident of the geographic area served by
the charter school must be a resident of this state.
Sec. 2. Section 261E.8, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. (1) Students from accredited nonpublic schools, and
students receiving competent private instruction or independent
private instruction under chapter 299A, students from charter
schools established pursuant to chapter 256E, and students
from charter schools or innovation zone schools established
pursuant to chapter 256F may access the program through the
school district in which the accredited nonpublic school, or
private institution, charter school, or innovation zone school
is located.
(2) Students from charter schools established pursuant to
chapter 256E, and students from charter schools or innovation
zone schools established pursuant to chapter 256F, that provide
educational instruction and course content that is delivered
entirely over the internet may access the program through the
students’ school district of residence.